zh-CN: 手柄配置: 深 V 型; 双把手; 水翼把手; 水翼; 套装把手; 单把手; 冲浪把手; T 型缠绕; 花式把手; 其他
nl: Handgreepconstructie: Deep-V; Dubbel; Foil; Hydrofoil; Handle set; Enkel; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Overig
es: Configuración del mango: En V profunda; Doble; Foil; Hydrofoil; Manija con paquete; Simple; Surf; Agarre en T; Para trucos; Otra
ja: ハンドル構造: ディープV; ダブル; フォイル; ハイドロフォイル; パッケージハンドル; シングル; サーフ; Tラップ; トリック; その他
fi: Kahvan kokoonpano: Syvä V; Kaksinkertainen; Foil; Kantosiipi; Pakettikahva; Yksinkertainen; Surffaus; T-wrap; Temppu; Muu
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ročaja: Globok V; Dvojno; Foil; Hidrofoil; Paketni ročaj; Enojno; Surfanje; T-ovoj; Za trike; Drugo
zh-TW: 把手配置: 深 V 型; 雙; 水翼; 水翼; 包裝提把; 單一; 衝浪; T 型包覆; 特技; 其他
ko: 핸들 구성: 딥-V; 더블; 포일; 하이드로포일; 패키지 핸들; 싱글; 서프; T-랩; 트릭; 기타
lt-LT: Rankenos konfigūracija: Gili V forma; Dviguba; Sparnas (Foil); Vandens sparnas („Hydrofoil“); Pakuotės rankena; Viena; Banglenčių; T formos aptvaras („T-wrap“); Trikų; Kita
it: Configurazione del handle: A V profonda; Doppia; Foil; Hydrofoil; Maniglia della confezione; Singola; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Altro
pt-PT: Configuração da alça: V profundo; Dupla; Foil; Hydrofoil; Conjunto corda e pega; Individual; Surf; T-wrap; Manobras; Outra
en: Handle configuration: Deep-V; Double; Foil; Hydrofoil; Package handle; Single; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Other
de: Griffkonfiguration: Tiefes V; Doppelt; Foil; Tragflügel; Package-Griff; Einzeln; Surf; T-Wrap; Trick; Sonstige
hu: Fogantyú kialakítása: Mély V (Deep-V); Dupla; Szárnyas; Hordszárnyas (Hydrofoil); Csomag fogantyú; Szimpla; Szörf; T-markolat (T-wrap); Trükk; Egyéb
nb: Håndtakskonfigurasjon: Dyp V; Dobbel; Foil; Hydrofoil; Pakkehåndtak; Enkelt; Surf; T-wrap; Triks; Annet
ru: Конфигурация ручки: Глубокая V-образная; Двойная; Фойл; Гидрофойл; Ручка с фалом; Одинарная; Для серфинга; Т-образная; Для трюков; Другое
hr-HR: Konfiguracija drške: Duboki V; Dvostruko; Foil; Hidrokrilno; Ručka integrirana u paket; Jednostruko; Surfanje; T-omot; Za trikove; Ostalo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia rukovätí: Hlboké V; Dvojité; Foil; Hydrofoil; Súprava s rukoväťou; Jednoduché; Surf; T-wrap; Trik; Iné
pt-BR: Configuração da alça: V profundo; Duplo; Foil; Hydrofoil; Manete de kit; Simples; Surf; T-wrap; Manobras; Outra
sv: Utformning av handtag: Djup V-form; Dubbel; Foil; Bärplan; Pakethandtag; Enskild; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Övrigt
tr: Sap yapılandırması: Derin V; Çift; Foil; Hydrofoil; Paket sapı; Tek; Sörf; T sargı; Hareket; Diğer
vi: Cấu hình tay cầm: Chữ V sâu; Đôi; Cánh ngầm; Cánh ngầm; Tay cầm dạng bộ; Đơn; Lướt sóng; Quấn chữ T; Kỹ thuật; Khác
ro-RO: Configurația mânerului: V adânc; Dublu; Foil; Hidrofoil; Mâner pachet; Simplu; Surf; Formă T; Acrobații; Altele
bg-BG: Конфигурация на дръжката: Дълбоко V; Двойна; Фойл; Хидрофойл; Дръжка на опаковката; Единична; Сърф; T-образно увиване; За трикове; Друго
th: รูปแบบโครงสร้างด้ามจับ: ทรง V ลึก; คู่; ฟอยล์; ไฮโดรฟอยล์; หูจับแบบแพ็กเกจ; เดี่ยว; เซิร์ฟ; T-wrap; ทริก; อื่นๆ
da: Konfiguration af håndtag: Dyb V; Dobbelt; Foil; Hydrofoil; Pakkehåndtag; Enkelt; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Andet
pl: Konfiguracja uchwytu: Głębokie V (deep-V); Podwójny; Foil; Hydrofoil; Uchwyt z linką (zestaw); Pojedynczy; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Inne
el: Διαμόρφωση λαβής: Deep-V; Διπλή; Foil; Hydrofoil; Λαβή πακέτου; Μονή; Surf; T-wrap; Trick; Άλλο
fr: Configuration des poignées: En V profond; Double; Foil; Hydrofoil; Poignée avec corde; Simple; Surf; T-wrap; Figures; Autre
cs: Nastavení rukojeti: Deep-V; Dvojitá; Foil; Hydrofoil; V sadě; Jednoduchá; Surf; T-wrap; Trik; Jiná